Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.210

Permit authorizing sale of stock—Examination and investigation—Issuance or denial.

Upon the filing of the application for a permit to sell stock, the director shall examine the application and other papers and documents filed therewith and he or she may make a detailed examination, audit, and investigation of the association and its affairs. If the director finds that the proposed plan for the issue and sale of such stock is fair, just and equitable, the director shall issue to the applicant a permit authorizing it to issue and dispose of its stock in such amounts and for such considerations and upon such terms and conditions as the director may provide in the permit. If the director does not so find he or she shall deny the application and notify the applicant in writing of his or her decision.

[ 1994 c 92 s 487; 1982 c 3 s 103; 1973 c 130 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.